Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 56
WESTERN COLORADO UNIVERSITY

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 7 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 2003, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 2003, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

23-56-101. University established - role and mission.

There is hereby established a university at Gunnison, which is known as Western Colorado university. Western Colorado university is a general baccalaureate institution with selective admission standards. Western Colorado university offers undergraduate liberal arts and sciences and professional degree programs, developmental education courses receiving resident credit pursuant to section 23-1-113.3, and a limited number of graduate programs. Western Colorado university also serves as a regional education provider.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 784, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 43, § 1, effective March 9.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1265, § 1, effective August 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-004), ch. 13, p. 123, § 7, effective August 6.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1083), ch. 63, p. 165, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1206), ch. 133, p. 605, § 19, effective April 25; entire section amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3541, § 1, July 1.

23-56-102. Board of trustees - creation - members - powers - duties.

There is established the board of trustees for Western Colorado university, referred to in this article 56 as the "board of trustees", which consists of eleven members and is the governing authority for Western Colorado university. The board of trustees is, and is hereby declared to be, a body corporate and, as such and by the names designated in this section, may:

Acquire and hold property for the use of Western Colorado university;

Be a party to all suits and contracts; and

Do all things necessary to carry out the provisions of this article 56 in like manner as municipal corporations of this state, including but not limited to the power to demand, receive, hold, and use for the best interests of Western Colorado university such money, lands, or other property as may be donated or devised to or for the university.

The board of trustees and its successors have perpetual succession, have a seal, may make bylaws and regulations for the well-ordering and governance of Western Colorado university, and may conduct the business of the university in a manner not repugnant to the constitution and laws of this state. The board of trustees shall elect from the appointed members a chairperson, whose duties and responsibilities are prescribed in the duly adopted bylaws of the board of trustees. The board of trustees shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who are not members of the board and whose duties and responsibilities are prescribed in the duly adopted bylaws of the board of trustees. The staff of Western Colorado university shall provide staff support for the board of trustees.

The governor shall appoint, with the consent of the senate, nine members of the board of trustees. Members appointed by the governor shall serve terms of up to four years, expiring on December 31 of the third calendar year following the calendar year in which the member is appointed; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than five members' terms expire in the same year. Of the nine members appointed by the governor, no more than five members may be affiliated with the same political party. Of the nine members appointed by the governor, at least two shall reside in Gunnison county. Each trustee shall hold office for the term for which the trustee has been appointed and until the trustee's successor is appointed and confirmed by the senate.

The tenth member of the board of trustees is a full-time junior or senior student at Western Colorado university, elected by the members of the student body of Western Colorado university. The term of the student member is one year, beginning on July 1 each year. The student member is advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions of the board of trustees, as provided by section 24-6-402.

The eleventh member is a member of the faculty of Western Colorado university elected by other members of the faculty for a term of two years, beginning on July 1 every odd-numbered year. The faculty member is advisory, without the right to vote and without the right to attend executive sessions of the board of trustees, as provided by section 24-6-402.

A vacancy of an appointed member of the board of trustees shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term. A vacancy of either of the elected members of the board of trustees shall be filled by election for the unexpired term. Each member of the board of trustees shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (6), the powers, duties, and functions formerly performed by the trustees of the state colleges in Colorado with respect to Western Colorado university are hereby transferred to the board of trustees. Policies, resolutions, procedures, and agreements previously approved by the trustees of the state colleges in Colorado and applicable to Western Colorado university remain in force and effect unless and until changed by the board of trustees.

In addition to those powers conferred elsewhere in this article 56, the board of trustees has the power to:

Appoint a president of Western Colorado university;

Appoint such other executive officers of the university as may be required;

Appoint faculty and employees as may be required;

Determine the compensation to be paid to the president, executive officers, faculty, and professional staff;

With the advice of the faculty, prescribe the degree programs for the university; and

Prescribe the student admissions qualifications.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 785, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended, p. 1233, § 8, effective May 26.

L. 2012:

(1), (3), (4), (6), and (7) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1265, § 2, effective August 1.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 696, § 17, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1), (3), (4), (6), IP(7), and (7)(a) amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3541, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-191), ch. 172, p. 947, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(2), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 41, § 51, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-56-102.5. Tuition - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1845, § 17, effective June 9.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1267, § 3, effective August 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2016. (See L. 2010, p. 1845.)

23-56-103. Board of trustees for Western Colorado university fund - creation - control - use.

There is created in the state treasury the board of trustees for Western Colorado university fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", which is under the control of and administered by the board of trustees in accordance with the provisions of this article 56. Except as otherwise allowed by state law, including but not limited to section 24-36-103 (2), all money received or acquired by the board of trustees or by Western Colorado university must be deposited in the fund, whether received by appropriation, grant, contract, or gift or by sale or lease of surplus real or personal property or by any other means, whose disposition is not otherwise provided for by law. All interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund is credited to the fund. The money in the fund is continuously appropriated to the board of trustees and remains in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of a fiscal year.

The money in the fund remains under the control of the board of trustees and must be used for the payment of salaries and operating expenses of the board of trustees and of Western Colorado university and for the payment of any other expenses incurred by the board of trustees in carrying out its powers and duties.

Moneys in the fund that are not needed for use by the board of trustees may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. The board of trustees shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund that may be invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of the amount.

and (5) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 787, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1267, § 4, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

(1) and (2) amended and (5) added, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3542, § 3, effective July 1.

23-56-104. Status and control.

The buildings and premises of the Western Colorado university form a part of the school system of the state and are controlled and managed by the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 787, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1268, § 5, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3543, § 4, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-56-102 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-56-105. Board of trustees empowered to lease grounds.

For the purpose of providing dormitories, living and dining halls, or cottages and equipment for the use of Western Colorado university, and to enable the construction, financing, and ultimate acquisition thereof, and to aid in improving undeveloped portions of the grounds of the Western Colorado university, the board of trustees is empowered to lease grounds under its control to private persons or corporations for a term not exceeding fifty years and subject to regulations as it may prescribe, and upon the condition that the private persons or corporations shall construct and equip on the leased grounds buildings or improvements as the board of trustees designates or approves and secure reimbursement for money invested therein from the rentals of the buildings or from their sale to the board of trustees acting for the state.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 787, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1268, § 6, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3543, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-56-103 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-56-106. No authority to obligate state.

Nothing in this article 56 constitutes authority to enter into a contract that in any way creates a debt or obligation upon the state on account of the construction of buildings or improvements; but buildings and improvements erected on lands under the control of the board of trustees and devoted to the uses of Western Colorado university under the terms of this article 56 and the leasehold interest are exempt from taxation so far as permitted by the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 787, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1331), ch. 254, p. 1268, § 7, effective August 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1178), ch. 400, p. 3543, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-56-104 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-56-107. Buildings - control of.

The management of buildings erected and equipped under the terms of this article and the scale of rentals thereof shall be subject to the approval of the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 788, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-56-105 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-56-108. Board of trustees may rent buildings.

The board of trustees is authorized to lease or rent buildings constructed under the provisions of this article from the private persons or corporations constructing the buildings upon such terms as it deems satisfactory as to current rental, maintenance, and ultimate purchase, paying therefor out of the revenues derived from the operation of the buildings by the board of trustees or from other funds under its control available for general maintenance purposes.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 788, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-56-106 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-56-109. To be state property at lease end.

Upon the termination of a lease or contract executed under the terms of this article providing for the construction and equipment of buildings, the buildings shall become the property of the state, together with all equipment, furnishings, or appurtenances therein contained or thereto attached; except that personal goods or effects of an occupant may be removed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 788, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-56-107 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-56-110. Leasehold interest may be sold.

Nothing in this article shall prevent the transfer or sale of the leasehold interests prior to their expiration, subject to the approval of the board of trustees.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 788, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-56-108 as it existed prior to 2003.

23-56-111. Board of trustees may rent rooms.

Upon the termination of a lease or contract executed with private persons or corporations for the construction of buildings under the terms of this article, the board of trustees is empowered to rent rooms or quarters in buildings erected under leases or contracts for reasonable compensation as the board deems best in relation to current operation, maintenance, and upkeep costs.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article R&RE, p. 788, § 6, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-56-109 as it existed prior to 2003.